Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Solid Wastes Disposal
§ 17-17-47.
Exclusive authority of State Oil and Gas Board as to regulation of oil field waste products.

Notwithstanding any other provisions contained in this chapter, the State Oil and Gas Board shall continue to exercise the exclusive authority to make rules and regulations and issue permits governing the noncommercial disposal of oil field waste products and shall continue to exercise the exclusive authority to regulate Class II underground injection wells in accordance with the provisions of Section 53-1-17; provided, however, that to the extent that such oil field exploration and production waste products may likewise constitute hazardous wastes under the provisions of this chapter, such rules and regulations shall be subject to the approval of the commission in order to insure that they are consistent with the requirements of this chapter and the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976 (Public Law 94-580).

The commission shall have the exclusive authority to regulate the commercial disposal of oil field exploration and production waste products subject to limitations set out in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 491, § 7; Laws, 1981, ch. 528, § 11; Laws, 1991, ch. 605, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1991).

§ 17-17-48.
Legislative intent as to regulation of radioactive waste disposal facilities.

It is the intent of this Legislature that the Mississippi Energy and Transportation Board shall have jurisdiction over state nuclear waste policy, activities and siting, including the long-term or temporary storage and/or disposal of high-level radioactive and transuranic waste, in accordance with the provisions of Sections 17-17-48 through 17-17-51 and Chapter 49 of Title 57, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 480, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 474, § 23; Laws, 1983, ch. 505, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1983).

§ 17-17-49.
Use of salt domes or other geologic structures for disposal of radioactive waste; penalties; enforcement; authorization.

No salt dome or other geologic structures within the jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi shall be the site of long-term or terminal disposal, or long-term storage for high-level radioactive wastes or other high-level radioactive material of any nature by any person, until the state has exhausted its administrative and legislative authority under the provisions of this section and Chapter 49 of Title 57, Mississippi Code of 1972, and the provisions of P.L. 97-425.

Whoever violates the provisions of this section, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each day upon which the violation occurred or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months, or both. Upon violation or upon reasonable belief of violation of this section, the State Attorney General shall institute proceedings for injunctive relief in the chancery court of the county in which the violation occurred to require the immediate cessation of any testing, on-site evaluation or any other site evaluation or selection procedure regarding possible use of any salt dome or geologic structure within the jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi, the immediate cessation of transportation of high-level radioactive waste or other high-level radioactive material to the site, and the immediate removal from the State of Mississippi of such materials already located on the site.

Any person, governmental entity, or any other entity desiring to use Mississippi salt domes or other geologic structures within the state for the disposal of radioactive wastes shall make notification to the Governor, the Legislature, and, pursuant to the provisions of Sections 17-17-48 through 17-17-51 and Chapter 49 of Title 57, Mississippi Code of 1972, the State Energy and Transportation Board. Such person, governmental entity, or other entity shall include with the aforementioned notification the selection method with evaluative criteria to be used and the methods and procedures of exploration to be used in selecting a site for a disposal facility. Such person, governmental entity, or other entity shall conduct such studies where specifically mandated to do so by this section in coordination with the above-mentioned state agencies, and shall assume the cost of any studies required by this section or required by the state agencies empowered to enforce the provisions of this section, whether or not the agencies or such person or entity actually conducts the study.

Such person, governmental entity, or other entity desiring to establish a waste facility as defined in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall conduct studies as follows to determine the feasibility of using Mississippi salt domes or other geologic structures within the state for the disposal of radioactive wastes. A hydrogeologic and geologic study shall be conducted. All basic data and documentation pertinent to all aspects of such studies together with any conclusions shall be presented as accumulated to the Governor, the Legislature, and, pursuant to the provisions of Sections 17-17-48 through 17-17-51 and Chapter 49 of Title 57, Mississippi Code of 1972, the State Energy and Transportation Board.

Such person, governmental entity, or other entity desiring to establish a waste facility as defined in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall conduct an environmental impact survey in conjunction with the Bureau of Pollution Control of the Department of Natural Resources or its successor. Copies of this completed survey shall be presented to the Governor, the Legislature, and the State Energy and Transportation Board.

Such person, governmental entity, or other entity desiring to establish a waste facility as defined in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall conduct a socioeconomic impact survey in conjunction with the University Research Center. Such survey shall include, but not be limited to, the allocation of costs regarding roads, bridges, relocation of persons and properties, and the effect on local tax revenues. Copies of this completed survey shall be sent to the Governor, the Legislature, and the State Energy and Transportation Board.

Upon the completion of such thorough technological, environmental and socioeconomic studies as required in subsection (3) of this section, the Governor shall consult with representatives of the agencies mentioned herein and with representatives of the affected county, including, but not limited to, the board of supervisors. The Governor shall thereafter determine the advisability of such facility at the proposed site. If the Governor’s decision after such consultations is favorable to the establishment of the nuclear waste disposal site, he shall advise the Legislature of his decision regarding creation of such disposal facility. If the Governor’s decision, after such consultations, is not favorable to the establishment of the nuclear waste storage and/or disposal facility, and after the president has recommended a site in the State of Mississippi for development as a repository, test and evaluation facility, interim storage facility or monitored, retrievable storage facility, the Governor shall notify the Legislature of that decision and either the Governor or the Legislature shall prepare and transmit to the Speaker of the United States House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the United States Senate a notice of disapproval of the site recommendation. The notice of disapproval shall contain a statement of those reasons for objection to the site recommendation. All such disposal or storage shall be made in strict adherence to guidelines established by the federal government, the Division of Radiological Health of the State Board of Health and the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 491, § 8; Laws, 1980, ch. 480, § 2; Laws, 1982, ch. 474, § 24; Laws, 1983, ch. 505, § 7; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 17-17-51.
Facilities licensed by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission.

Nothing in Sections 17-17-48 through 17-17-51 or in Chapter 49 of Title 57, Mississippi Code of 1972 prohibits or is intended to prohibit the shipment, receipt, use or on-site storage of nuclear fuel assemblies to a facility licensed by the nuclear regulatory commission, or the transportation from the facility of spent nuclear fuel assemblies to a licensed reprocessing plant or to a licensed away-from-reactor storage facility.

Provided further, that nothing in Sections 17-17-48 through 17-17-51 or in Chapter 49 of Title 57, Mississippi Code of 1972 prohibits or is intended to prohibit the on-site storage of low-level radioactive waste that is generated at a facility licensed by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 480, § 3; Laws, 1982, ch. 474, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1982).

§ 17-17-53.
Commercial hazardous and nonhazardous waste facilities to file annual reports and pay disposal fees; fee calculation; disposition of proceeds.

On or before July 15 of each year, the owner or operator of every commercial hazardous waste management facility shall file with the State Tax Commission and the department a statement, verified by oath, showing by category the total amounts of hazardous waste managed for a fee at the facility during the preceding calendar year, and shall at the same time pay to the State Tax Commission a sum equal to:

Ten Dollars ($10.00) per ton for hazardous waste generated and disposed of in the state by landfilling or any other means of land disposal and for hazardous waste generated and stored for one (1) year or more in the state;

Two Dollars ($2.00) per ton for hazardous waste generated and treated in the state and for hazardous waste generated and stored for less than one (1) year in the state; and

One Dollar ($1.00) per ton for hazardous waste generated and recovered in the state.

For all hazardous waste generated outside of the state and received at a commercial hazardous waste management facility during the preceding calendar year, each owner or operator of a commercial hazardous waste management facility shall pay to the State Tax Commission an amount equal to the per-ton fee imposed on the management of out-of-state waste by the state from which the hazardous waste originated, but in any event no less than the per-ton fees described in subsection (1) of this section.

Repealed.

All monies received by the State Tax Commission hereunder shall be appropriated and utilized as follows:

Thirty-five percent (35%) shall be remitted to the Department of Environmental Quality to be held for the perpetual care and maintenance account of commercial facilities for the management of hazardous or nonhazardous solid waste.

Thirty-five percent (35%) shall be remitted to the department to defray costs of the waste minimization program and evaluation of uncontrolled sites.

Subject to the provisions of Section 17-17-55, all other funds shall be paid to the general fund of the municipality or county within which the facility is located.

All administrative provisions of the Mississippi Sales Tax Law, including those which fix damages, penalties and interest for nonpayment of taxes and for noncompliance with the provisions of such chapter, and all other duties and requirements imposed upon taxpayers, shall apply to all persons liable for fees under the provisions of this chapter, and the Tax Commissioner shall exercise all the power and authority and perform all the duties with respect to taxpayers under this chapter as are provided in the Mississippi Sales Tax Law except where there is a conflict, then the provisions of this chapter shall control.

Each generator of greater than two hundred twenty (220) pounds of hazardous waste in any calendar month, each transporter of hazardous waste, and the owner or operator of any facility for the treatment, storage, recycling or disposal of hazardous waste shall report annually by a date determined by the department on forms provided by the department the types and amounts of hazardous waste generated, managed and/or shipped during the preceding calendar year. To the extent practicable, the department shall adopt forms consistent with biennial report forms used by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 490, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 536, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 539, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 458, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1998).

§ 17-17-54.
Uncontrolled Site Evaluation Trust Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a fund to be designated as the Uncontrolled Site Evaluation Trust Fund, referred to in this section as “fund,” to be administered by the Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.

Monies in the fund shall be utilized to pay reasonable direct and indirect costs associated with the administration and evaluation of uncontrolled sites, including, but not limited to, the reasonable costs of the following activities:

Reviewing plans, specifications, engineering reports and other documents related to site assessments, preliminary assessments, site investigations, remedial investigations, feasibility studies, remedy selection, remedial design, remedial actions, site specific risk assessments and operation and maintenance;

Establishing cleanup levels and objectives and risk targets and reviewing cleanup alternatives and technologies;

Administering the uncontrolled sites program, including, but not limited to, collecting and analyzing data, conducting site inspections and site monitoring activities, maintaining a computerized database, of site inventories and status, and providing any necessary further action or no further action letters;

Preparing generally applicable or relevant and appropriate requirements or guidance;

Conducting other activities directly related to the administration and evaluation of uncontrolled sites.

Expenditures may be made from the fund upon requisition by the executive director of the department.

The fund shall be treated as a special trust fund. Interest earned on the principal therein shall be credited by the treasurer to the fund.

The fund may receive monies from any available public or private source, including, but not limited to, collection of fees, interest, grants, taxes, public and private donations, judicial actions and appropriated funds.

Monies in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be retained in the fund for use in the next succeeding fiscal year.

There is hereby created the Uncontrolled Site Voluntary Evaluation Program to provide for the administration and evaluation of uncontrolled sites. If any person has a legal or equitable interest in a site within the jurisdiction of the uncontrolled sites program at the department, and that site is not currently under expedited review or evaluation, that person may request that the department accelerate such review by considering the site under the voluntary evaluation program. The department shall determine the eligibility of an uncontrolled site for inclusion into the voluntary evaluation program. The site may be placed in the voluntary program if:

The department accepts the site for the voluntary review and evaluation; and

The person pays to the department the fees as specified in a fee schedule adopted by the commission.

The owner of an uncontrolled site who participates in the voluntary program shall pay all costs of any actions associated with the administration and evaluation of the site.

The commission shall set by order a schedule of fees and costs for the Uncontrolled Site Voluntary Evaluation Program.

All monies collected under this section shall be deposited into the fund.

The commission may delegate to the department responsibility for the collection of uncontrolled site administration and evaluation fees.

All uncontrolled site administration and evaluation fees shall be due before a date specified by the department in an invoice which shall be no less than thirty (30) days following the invoice date. If any part of an uncontrolled site administration and evaluation fees imposed is not paid within thirty (30) days after the due date, a penalty of up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount due may be imposed and be added thereto. Any penalty collected under this section shall be deposited into the fund. If the department has to pursue legal action to collect fees incurred, reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs may be assessed against the nonpaying party.

Any person required to pay a fee under this section who disagrees with the calculation or applicability of the fee may petition the commission for a hearing in accordance with Section 49-17-35. Any hearing shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 49-17-33.

Fees collected under this section shall not supplant or reduce in any way the General Fund appropriation to the Department of Environmental Quality.

The department may suspend any activities or actions related to the administration or evaluation of an uncontrolled site if the person fails to meet any condition or requirement or fails to pay any required fees or penalties imposed under the voluntary evaluation program.

Nothing in this section affects any existing program at the department or affects any authority of the commission or department to take any action authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 488, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 17-17-55.
Hazardous Waste Facility Site Revolving Fund; purpose of fund; rules and regulations.

There is hereby created within the State Treasury a revolving fund to be known as the “Hazardous Waste Facility Site Revolving Loan Fund,” which shall be administered by the Department of Economic and Community Development, for the purpose of making loans to municipalities or counties in which commercial hazardous waste facilities permitted pursuant to Section 49-17-28 et seq. are located. Such loans shall be made for the purpose of constructing roads, railroads, utilities or the purchase and development of lands for industrial purposes. Any municipality or county within which such a facility is sited may make application for a loan from the Hazardous Waste Facility Site Revolving Loan Fund, and the Department of Economic and Community Development is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt and put into effect all reasonable rules and regulations that it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this section, which shall include, without limitation, the following:

Procedures for applying for the loans;

Selection criteria for evaluating if a proposed facility meets Mississippi’s needs and for choosing between various loan applications;

Procedures for funding and retiring loans; and

Procedures to be followed if default occurs in the repayment of loans.

In addition, the Department of Economic and Community Development is empowered to designate that any part or all of those funds to be disbursed pursuant to Section 17-17-53(2)(c) be paid directly against the principal balance of any loan outstanding hereunder.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 490, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 506, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1990).

§ 17-17-57.
Immunity of persons rendering aid in accidents involving discharge of hazardous materials.

For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the meaning ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Discharge” shall include leakage, seepage or other release of any hazardous material.

“Hazardous materials” shall include all materials and substances which are now or hereafter designated or defined as hazardous by any state or federal law or by regulation of any state or federal agency.

“Person” shall include any individual, partnership, corporation, association or other entity.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no person who in good faith and in the exercise of reasonable care, and not in anticipation or expectation of receiving compensation therefor, renders assistance or advice in mitigating or attempting to mitigate the effects of an actual or threatened discharge of hazardous materials, or in preventing, cleaning up or disposing of or in attempting to prevent, clean up or dispose of any such discharge, shall be subject to civil liabilities or penalties as a result of any act committed in good faith and in the exercise of reasonable care or omission in good faith and in the exercise of reasonable care by such person in rendering emergency assistance, or advice.

Nothing in subsection (2) of this section shall be construed to limit the liability of any person for any act not directly related to the assistance or advice in mitigating or attempting to mitigate the effects of an actual or threatened discharge of hazardous materials, or in preventing, cleaning up or disposing of or in attempting to prevent, clean up or dispose of any such discharge.

The immunities provided in subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to any person whose act or omission caused in whole or in part such actual or threatened discharge and who would otherwise be liable therefor.

Nothing in subsection (2) of this section shall be construed to limit or otherwise affect the liability of any person for damages resulting from such person’s gross negligence, or from such person’s reckless, wanton or intentional conduct.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 358, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 17-17-59.
Moratorium on new or expanded nonhazardous solid waste facilities.

In order to insure adequate capacity to meet local needs for the management of solid wastes generated locally, to protect the public health and welfare of the people of the State of Mississippi and to enable the state to study, consider and implement a comprehensive statewide nonhazardous solid waste management plan, there is hereby imposed a moratorium commencing on April 2, 1990, and ending upon the approval date of a local nonhazardous solid waste management plan for the area within the approved plan on the processing of permit applications, the issuance of permits for new or expanded municipal solid waste facilities and the transfer of existing permits for the incineration, treatment, processing or disposal of municipal solid wastes. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the moratorium shall also apply to all applications for permits and transfers of permits for new or expanded municipal solid waste management facilities and the transfer of existing permits for incineration, treatment, processing or disposal facility pending before the permit board during the moratorium period.

For the purposes of this section, the term “municipal solid waste” means municipal solid waste as defined in Section 17-17-205, but does not include ash or scrubber sludge from the generation of electric power or steam.

The permit board created in Section 49-17-28 is hereby authorized and empowered to make exceptions to the moratorium imposed by this section and allow the processing of permit applications, issuance of permits and the transfer of permits if the permit board, in its discretion, determines that a local need exists for a new or expanded municipal solid waste incinerator, treatment, processing or disposal facility in order to:

Comply with the federal law or regulations of the United States Environmental Protection Agency;

Alleviate or resolve a condition resulting from an existing municipal solid waste facility having reached its capacity for the disposal of locally generated solid wastes;

Alleviate or resolve a condition which threatens or is likely to threaten the environment; or

Alleviate or resolve a condition in which the closure of an existing municipal solid waste facility, or the transfer of an existing permit, is in the best interests of the public in order to adequately manage locally generated municipal solid wastes.

If the permit board grants an exception from the moratorium for a new or expanded municipal solid waste landfill facility for which a permit application is pending on April 2, 1990, the processing of the application for the permit shall resume at the stage of the administrative review process existing on April 2, 1990.

The moratorium imposed by this section shall not apply to:

The processing by personnel of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality of permit applications for the recycling of municipal solid wastes up to the time that the personnel of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality make their recommendations on such permit applications to the permit board.

Solid waste incineration, treatment, processing or disposal facilities owned and operated by the generator of the solid waste for the incineration, treatment, processing or disposal of the generator’s solid waste only.

Applications for reissuance of permits for existing nonhazardous solid waste facilities.

Application for permits for any facility consistent with an approved local nonhazardous solid waste management plan for a county or region.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 516, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 17; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 17-17-61.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1994, ch. 624, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

[Laws, 1992, ch. 583, § 18]

§ 17-17-63.
Mississippi Nonhazardous Solid Waste Corrective Action Trust Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a fund designated as the Mississippi Nonhazardous Solid Waste Corrective Action Trust Fund for the purpose of providing funds for emergency, preventive or corrective actions which may be required or determined necessary by the department of any nonhazardous solid waste disposal facility that received, in whole or in part, household waste and closed before the effective date of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, Section 258.

The trust fund shall be administered by the executive director. The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of the fund and for a system of priorities for related projects eligible for funding. Only the facilities meeting the criteria in subsection (1) are eligible for funding.

The commission may escalate, expend or utilize funds in the trust fund for the following purposes:

To take whatever emergency action is necessary or appropriate to assure that the public health or safety is not threatened whenever there is a release or substantial threat of a release of contaminants from any source within the permitted area of an eligible facility;

To take preventive or corrective actions where the release of contaminants from any source within the permitted area of an eligible facility which presents an actual or potential threat to human health or the environment including, but not limited to, closure and post-closure care of an eligible facility;

To take any actions as may be necessary to monitor and provide post-closure care of any eligible facility, including preventive and corrective actions, without regard to identity or solvency of the owner thereof; and

To set aside ten percent (10%) annually to provide grants for regional recycling cooperatives formed by local governments for the purpose of jointly participating in the collection, processing and marketing of recyclables. The commission shall establish regulations regarding the eligibility and distribution of the regional recycling cooperative grants.

The fund may not be used to pay for the normal costs of closure and post-closure care of an eligible facility or where no release or substantial threat of a release of contaminants has been found by the commission.

Expenditures may be made from the fund upon requisition by the executive director.

The fund shall be treated as a special trust fund. Interest earned on the principal in the fund shall be credited by the department to the fund, unless funds allocated under Section 17-17-219(3)(a)(i) are being paid to the Local Governments Solid Waste Assistance Fund. If those funds are being paid to the Local Governments Solid Waste Assistance Fund, the department shall credit the earned interest to the Local Governments Solid Waste Assistance Fund.

The fund may receive monies from any available public or private source including, but not limited to, collection of fees, interest, grants, taxes, public and private donations, petroleum violation escrow funds or refunds and appropriated funds.

The department shall transfer any balance in the fund on July 1, 1997, in excess of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) to the Local Governments Solid Waste Assistance Fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 19; Laws, 1994, ch. 619, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 596, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 383, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 348, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 17, 2014).

§ 17-17-65.
Local Governments Solid Waste Assistance Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a fund designated as the Local Governments Solid Waste Assistance Fund, referred to in this section as “fund,” to be administered by the executive director of the department.

The fund shall be used to provide grants to counties, municipalities, regional solid waste management authorities or multicounty entities as provided in subsection (5) of this section for one or more of the following purposes:

Cleanup of existing and future unauthorized dumps on public or private property, subject to the limitation in subsection (4) of this section;

Establishment of a collection center or program for white goods, recyclables or other bulky rubbish waste not managed by local residential solid waste collection programs;

Provision of public notice and education related to the proper management of solid waste, including recycling;

Payment of a maximum of fifty percent (50%) of the cost of employing a local solid waste enforcement officer;

Distribution and use as grants to regional solid waste management authorities, counties and municipalities for implementation of household hazardous waste collection programs, in accordance with Sections 17-17-439 through 17-17-445. The grants shall not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of eligible project costs as established by the commission;

Development of other local solid waste management program activities associated with the prevention, enforcement or abatement of unauthorized dumps, as approved by the commission; and

Provide assistance to counties and municipalities for the establishment of regional recycling centers at regional correctional facilities.

The commission shall earmark ten percent (10%) of the amount deposited in the fund annually to be used to make grants to counties, municipalities, regional solid waste management authorities or multicounty entities to assist in defraying the cost of preparing solid waste management plans required by Section 17-17-227. The commission shall award these grants according to the merit of grant proposals received by the commission and the level of need and timeliness of the requirement for the county or regional solid waste management authority to update its solid waste management plan.

If a person is found to be responsible for creating an unauthorized dump, the grantee shall make a reasonable effort to require that person to clean up the property before expending any monies from the fund to clean up the property. If the grantee is unable to locate the person responsible for creating the dump, or if the grantee determines that person is financially or otherwise incapable of cleaning up the property, the grantee may use the monies from the fund to clean up the property and shall make a reasonable effort to recover from the responsible person any funds expended.

Of monies annually deposited in the fund and any balance remaining in the fund, the commission shall annually allocate monies as follows:

One-half (1/2) of the deposited funds and remaining balance shall be allocated to each county based on the percentage of state aid road mileage as established by the Mississippi Department of Transportation State Aid road formula.

One-half (1/2) of the deposited funds and remaining balance shall be made available to counties or municipalities for grants on a competitive basis.

The department shall notify the president of the board of supervisors of each county in writing of the amount allocated under paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection and that additional funds are available on a competitive basis as provided under paragraph (a)(ii) of this subsection.

Upon receipt of a scope of work and cost proposal acceptable to the commission, the commission shall award a grant to a county up to the allocated amount for that county under paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection. The commission may award additional grant funds from monies available under paragraph (a)(ii) of this subsection based upon the acceptable scope of work and cost proposal.

The commission may award grants to a regional solid waste management authority or other multicounty entity upon submission of a consolidated scope of work and cost proposal acceptable to the commission and authorized by the member counties. Upon submission of a scope of work and cost proposal, the commission may award grants to municipalities from monies available under paragraph (a)(ii) of this subsection.

No grantee shall use more than three percent (3%) of funds provided under this section to defray the costs of administration of the grant.

The department may use up to three percent (3%) of monies annually deposited in the fund and of any balance remaining in the fund to provide for the administration of this section.

Expenditures may be made from the fund upon requisition by the executive director of the department.

The fund shall be treated as a special trust fund. Interest earned on the principal in the fund shall be credited by the department to the fund.

The fund may receive monies from any available public or private source, including, but not limited to, collection of fees, interest, grants, taxes, public and private donations, judicial actions and appropriated funds.

Monies in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be retained in the fund for use in the succeeding fiscal year.

The commission may consolidate any grant provided under this section with any grant provided under the waste tire management program or the right-way-to-throw-away program. Funds provided through any consolidated grant shall be used in accordance with the program under which the funds are provided.

Funds provided under this section shall not be used to pay any costs of the establishment or operation of a landfill, rubbish disposal site or other type of solid waste disposal facility, for the routine collection of garbage or to collect any fees assessed under Section 19-5-21 or 21-19-2.

The commission shall not provide any funds under this section to any grantee with an inadequate garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system as required under Section 19-5-17 or 21-19-1.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 596, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 483, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 318, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 17-17-67.
Environmental felony for purposeful or reckless disposition of hazardous waste; penalties.

Any person who purposely or recklessly disposes of any hazardous waste in violation of this chapter which contaminates a drinking water source to the extent that it is unsafe for human consumption, as determined by the state agency charged with the responsibility of regulating safe drinking water for human consumption; or any person who purposely or recklessly disposes of any hazardous waste in violation of this chapter and who knows that he places another person in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony, and shall be subject to imprisonment for a term of not less than one (1) year nor more than ten (10) years, and shall also be subject to a fine of not less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) nor more than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) for each day of violation or both fine and imprisonment. The fine shall not exceed a total of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00).

For purposes of this section, a person acts purposely with respect to a material element of an offense when:

If the element involves the nature of his conduct or a result thereof, it is his conscious object to engage in conduct of that nature or to cause such a result; and

If the element involves the attendant circumstances, he is aware of the existence of such circumstances or he believes or hopes that they exist.

For purposes of this section, a person acts recklessly with respect to a material element of an offense when he consciously disregards a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the material element exists or will result from his conduct. The risk must be of such a nature and degree that, considering the nature and purpose of the actor’s conduct and the circumstances known to him, its disregard involves a gross deviation from the standard of conduct that a law-abiding person would observe in the actor’s situation.

This section shall not apply to any person holding a permit from the Department of Environmental Quality and acting within the scope of that permit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 301, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Jan. 20, 2003.).